Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.150.310

National guard youth challenge program—Allocation of funding—Rules.

Basic and nonbasic education funding, including applicable vocational entitlements and special education program money, generated under this chapter and under state appropriations acts shall be allocated directly to the military department for a national guard youth challenge program for students earning high school graduation credit under *RCW 28A.305.170. Funding shall be provided based on statewide average rates for basic education, special education, categorical, and block grant programs as determined by the office of the superintendent of public instruction. The monthly full-time equivalent enrollment reported for students enrolled in the national guard youth challenge program shall be based on one full-time equivalent for every one hundred student hours of scheduled instruction eligible for high school graduation credit. The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the military department, shall adopt such rules as are necessary to implement this section.

[ 2002 c 291 s 2.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 28A.305.170 was recodified as RCW 28A.300.165 pursuant to 2006 c 263 s 419.